sl-SI: Priloženi deli kompleta bejzbolske igrače: Žoga; Tlačilka za žoge; Baze; Kij; Mreža za trening odbijanja; Stojalo za odbijanje; Torba za prenašanje; Stožci/označevalci; Rokavica; Čelada; Domača baza; Navodila za uporabo; Mreža za odboj žoge; Semafor/tarča; Drugo
sk-SK: Vrátane súčastí hračkárskej baseballovej sady: Loptička; Pumpa na loptičku; Méty; Pálka; Sieť na nácvik odpalov; Statív na odpalovanie (tee); Taška na prenášanie; Kužele/značky; Rukavica; Prilba; Domáca méta; Návod na použitie; Odrážacia sieť (Rebounder); Hodnotiaca tabuľa/terč; Iné
ru: Состав набора игрушек для бейсбола: Мяч; Насос для мяча; Базы; Бита; Сетка для отработки ударов; Подставка для отбивания; Сумка для переноски; Конусы / маркеры; Перчатка / ловушка; Шлем; Домашняя база; Руководство с инструкциями; Экран для отскока / ребаундер; Табло / мишень; Другое
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no conjunto de brinquedos de basebol: Bola; Bomba para bolas; Bases; Taco; Rede de treino de rebatidas; Suporte de rebatida; Saco de transporte; Cones/marcadores; Luva; Capacete; Base principal; Guia de instruções; Ressaltador de lançamentos; Marcador/alvo; Outro
sv: Komponenter för basebolleksak som ingår: Boll; Bollpump; Baser; Slagträ; Nät för slagträning; Slag-tee; Bärväska; Koner/markeringar; Handske/mitt; Hjälm; Hemmabas; Instruktionsguide; Studsnät (rebounder); Poängtavla/måltavla; Övrigt
lt-LT: Į komplektą įeinantys beisbolo žaislų rinkinio komponentai: Kamuoliukas; Kamuolio pompa; Bazės; Lazda; Atmušimo treniruočių tinklas; Atmušimo stovas; Krepšys; Kūgeliai / žymekliai; Pirštinė; Šalmas; Pagrindinė bazė; Naudojimo vadovas; Grąžinimo tinklas / atšokėjas; Švieslentė / taikinys; Kita
it: Componenti del set giocattolo da baseball inclusi: Palla; Pompa per palla; Basi; Mazza; Rete per la pratica di battuta; Supporto da battuta; Borsa per il trasporto; Coni/Indicatori; Guanto/Guanto a manopola; Casco; Casa base; Manuale di istruzioni; Rimbalzatore; Tabellone/Bersaglio; Altro
hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta igrački za bejzbol: Loptica; Pumpa za lopte; Baze; Palica; Mreža za vježbanje udaranja; Stalak za udaranje; Torba za nošenje; Čunjevi/oznake; Rukavica; Kaciga; Kućna baza; Vodič s uputama; Mreža za odbijanje; Semafor / meta; Ostalo
nb: Inkluderte deler i baseball-lekesett: Ball; Ballpumpe; Baser; Balltre; Nett til slagtrening; Slagstativ; Bæreveske; Kjegler/markører; Hanske/vott; Hjelm; Hjemmebase; Instruksjonsveiledning; Tilbakeslagsnett/rebounder; Poengtavle/mål; Annet
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des Baseball-Sets für Kinder: Ball; Ballpumpe; Bases; Schläger; Trainingsnetz; Batting Tee; Tragetasche; Hütchen/Markierungen; Handschuh/Mitt; Helm; Homeplate; Bedienungsanleitung; Pitch-Back/Rebounder; Anzeigetafel/Ziel; Sonstige
tr: Dahil olan beysbol oyuncak seti parçaları: Top; Top pompası; Kaleler; Sopa; Vuruş antrenman ağı; Vuruş destek çubuğu; Taşıma çantası; Koniler/işaretleyiciler; Eldiven; Kask; Ev kalesi; Eğitim rehberi; Atış geri tepme/sektirme ağı; Skor tabelası/hedef; Diğer
zh-CN: 包含棒球玩具套装组件: 球; 打气筒; 垒包; 球棒; 击球练习网; 击球座; 便携袋; 标志筒/标志物; 手套; 头盔; 本垒板; 说明书; 回弹网; 记分板/目标靶; 其他
ja: 野球トイセットコンポーネント付き: ボール; ボールポンプ; ベース; バット; バッティング練習用ネット; バッティングティー; キャリーバッグ; コーン/マーカー; グローブ/ミット; ヘルメット; ホームベース; 取扱説明書; ピッチバック/リバウンダー; スコアボード/ターゲット; その他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται εξαρτήματα σετ παιχνιδιού μπέιζμπολ: Μπάλα; Τρόμπα μπάλας; Βάσεις; Ρόπαλο; Δίχτυ προπόνησης χτυπημάτων (batting); Βάση χτυπήματος; Τσάντα μεταφοράς; Κώνοι / δείκτες; Γάντι; Κράνος; Home plate; Οδηγός οδηγιών; Δίχτυ αναπήδησης (rebounder); Πίνακας σκορ / στόχος; Άλλο
nl: Meegeleverde onderdelen honkbalspeelgoedset: Bal; Balpomp; Honken; Knuppel; Slagtrainingsnet; Batting tee; Draagtas; Pionnen/markeringen; Handschoen/mitt; Helm; Thuisplaat; Instructiegids; Pitch-back/rebounder; Scorebord/doelwit; Overig
ro-RO: Componente din setul de jucării de baseball incluse: Minge; Pompă de mingi; Baze; Bâtă; Plasă pentru antrenament de lovire; Suport pentru minge; Geantă de transport; Conuri/marcaje; Mănușă; Cască; Baza principală; Ghid de instrucțiuni; Rebounder/plasă de respingere; Tabelă de marcaj/țintă; Altele
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu zabawkowego do baseballa: Piłka; Pompka do piłki; Bazy; Kij; Siatka treningowa do odbijania; Stojak do odbijania; Torba do przenoszenia; Pachołki/znaczniki; Rękawica; Kask; Baza domowa; Instrukcja; Siatka odbijająca; Tablica wyników/cel; Inne
fi: Mukana tulevat baseball-leikkisetin osat: Pallo; Pallopumppu; Pesät; Maila; Lyöntiharjoitusverkko; Lyöntiteline; Kantolaukku; Kartiot/merkit; Räpylä; Kypärä; Kotipesä; Käyttöohje; Palautusverkko; Tulostaulu/maali; Muu
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดของเล่นเบสบอลที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ลูกบอล; ที่สูบลม; เบส; ไม้ตี; ตาข่ายซ้อมตี; แท่นตีบอล; กระเป๋าใส่; กรวย/มาร์กเกอร์; ถุงมือ; หมวกกันน็อก; โฮมเพลต; คู่มือ; ตาข่ายกระดอนบอลกลับ; กระดานคะแนน/เป้าหมาย; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 包含棒球玩具組組件: 球; 打氣筒; 壘包; 球棒; 打擊練習網; 打擊座; 攜帶包; 標記錐/標記墊; 手套/連指手套; 頭盔; 本壘板; 說明指南; 回彈網; 計分板/標靶; 其他
pt-BR: Componentes do conjunto de brinquedos de beisebol incluídos: Bola; Bomba de ar; Bases; Taco; Rede de prática de rebatida; Suporte de rebatida; Bolsa de transporte; Cones/marcadores; Luva; Capacete; Home plate; Guia de instruções; Rede de retorno; Placar/alvo; Outros
fr: Composants de coffret de jouets de baseball inclus: Balle; Pompe à balle; Bases; Batte; Filet de pratique de frappe; Tee de frappeur; Sac de transport; Cônes/marqueurs; Gant; Casque; Marbre; Guide d’instructions; Rebondeur/filet de rebond; Tableau de bord/cible; Autre
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm của bộ đồ chơi bóng chày: Bóng; Bơm bóng; Chốt gôn; Gậy; Lưới tập đánh bóng; Trụ đặt bóng (Tee); Túi đựng; Cọc tiêu/vật đánh dấu; Găng tay; Mũ bảo hiểm; Chốt nhà; Sách hướng dẫn; Lưới nảy bóng (Pitch-back/rebounder); Bảng điểm/mục tiêu; Khác
es: Componentes del juego de juguetes de béisbol incluidos: Pelota; Inflador de pelotas; Bases; Bate; Red de práctica de bateo; Tee de bateo; Bolsa de transporte; Conos/marcadores; Guante/mascota; Casco; Plato de home; Guía de instrucciones; Red de rebote/retorno; Marcador/objetivo; Otro
ko: 야구 장난감 세트 포함 구성품: 공; 볼 펌프; 베이스; 배트; 타격 연습용 네트; 배팅 티; 휴대용 가방; 콘/마커; 글러브/미트; 헬멧; 홈 플레이트; 설명서; 피치백/리바운더; 점수판/타겟; 기타
en: Baseball toy set components included: Ball; Ball pump; Bases; Bat; Batting practice net; Batting tee; Carrying bag; Cones/markers; Glove/mitt; Helmet; Home plate; Instruction guide; Pitch-back/rebounder; Scoreboard/target; Other
hu: A baseball játék szett tartalma: Labda; Labdapumpa; Bázisok; Ütő; Ütőgyakorló háló; Ütőállvány; Hordozótáska; Bóják/jelölők; Kesztyű; Sisak; Hazai bázis; Használati útmutató; Visszapattanó háló; Eredményjelző/cél; Egyéb
bg-BG: С включени компоненти в бейзболния комплект за игра: Топка; Помпа за топка; Бази; Бухалка; Мрежа за тренировка на батер; Стойка за батиране; Чанта за носене; Конуси/маркери; Ръкавица; Каска; Хоум плейт; Ръководство с инструкции; Мрежа за отскачане; Информационно табло/мишена; Друго
da: Baseball-legetøjssætkomponenter medfølger: Bold; Boldpumpe; Baser; Bat; Net til slagtræning; Slag-tee; Bæretaske; Kegler/markører; Handske; Hjelm; Home plate; Vejledning; Pitch-back/rebounder; Måltavle/mål; Andet
cs: Obsažené součásti baseballové herní sady: Míč; Pumpička na míč; Mety; Pálka; Odpalovací síť; Odpalovací stativ (tee); Přenosná taška; Kužely/značky; Rukavice; Helma; Domácí meta; Návod k použití; Odrazová síť; Výsledková tabule / terč; Jiné